New York, session 2025-2026, A6488.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 2801-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 2801-c. Model codes of conduct on school property. The department 4 shall, in collaboration with the New York state council of school super- 5 intendents and the New York state school boards association, produce 6 model codes of conduct on school property for any building, structure 7 and surrounding outdoor grounds, including entrances or exits, contained 8 within a public or private pre-school, nursery school, elementary or 9 secondary school's legally defined property boundaries as registered in 10 a county clerk's office. Such model codes of conduct shall include, but 11 not be limited to, the use of cellphones by students during school hours 12 and during classroom instruction. Such model codes shall be posted to 13 the department's website. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 15 the date on which it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 16 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 17 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 18 to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10235-01-5